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DTC

P0335/ 13[Engine Speed Sensor Circuit

1 (NE Circuit)

CIRCUIT DESCRIPTION

The crankshaft position sensor in the engine control system contains signal plate and a pickup coil for TDC
signal. The TDC signal plate has
signal for every engine revolution. The engine ECU detects the top dead center by the TDC signals.

The engine speed sensor in the engine control system contains signal plate and a pickup coil for NE signal.
The NE signal plate has 78 teeth and is mounted in the injection pump. The NE signal sensor generates 78
signals every 2 engine revolutions. The engine ECU detects the engine speed and cam lift position of the
injection pump. The engine ECU uses TDC signal and NE signals for injection timing control. The NE signal
is also used for injection volume control.

1 tooth onits outer circumference. The TDC signal sensor generates
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DTC No. DTC Detection Condition Trouble Area
No NE signal to engine ECU for 0.5 sec. or more at 580 rpm or
more * Openorshortinengine speed sensor circuit
P0335/13 - - - « Engine speed sensor
No NE signal to engine ECU for 2.0 sec. or more during crank- | Engine ECU
ing
TDC and NE Signal Waveforms Reference: INSPECTION USING OSCILLOSCOPE
2 V/DIV. During cranking or idling, check between terminals NE+ and
™ J J NE- oftheengine ECU.
C r HINT:
The correct waveforms are as shown.
NE
Y 20msec./Division (Idling) A23898
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WIRING DIAGRAM
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INSPECTION PROCEDURE

1 Checkresistance of engine speed sensor (See Pub No. RM6 17E,FU -113).

(SeePubNo.RM6 17E,FU -113).

NG> Check and replace injection pump
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2 [ Check for open and short in harness and connector between engine ECU and
engine speed sensor (See page IN-19).

NG> Repair or replace harness or connector.

OK
~_—

3 [Inspect sensor installation.

NG> Tighten sensor.

@

Check and replace engine ECU (See page
IN-19).
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